Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 4. Accounts of Overseer of Poor

§ 1651.
Repealed. 1967, No. 147, § 53(b), eff. Oct. 1, 1968.

§ 1652.
Records of overseers of the poor.

Effective October 1, 1968, the office of overseer of the poor is abolished.
On that day or as soon thereafter as possible the overseer of the poor shall turn all records of the office over to the town clerk of his or her town, who shall thereafter keep them until authorized by law to dispose of them.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 147

, § 37, eff. Oct. 1, 1968.